District of Columbia statutes.
42-1014

Trust powers imperative — Effect of grantee’s right of selection of objects of trust.

A trust power does not cease to be imperative where the grantee has the right to select any and exclude others of the persons designated as the objects of the trust.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1354, ch. 854, § 1050

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-114.
1973 Ed., § 45-1014.